apertium-yor.yor.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Yoruba

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>  ! Noun
%<pl%> ! Plural
%<sg%> ! Singular
%<aa%> ! Animate
%<nn%> ! Inanimate
%<np%> ! Proper noun
%<ant%> ! Anthroponym
%<loc%> ! Location
%<vblex%> ! Verb



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
VerbRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot

ilé ILÉ_N ; ! house
ẹran ILÉ_N ; ! animal
oko ILÉ_N ; ! farm
ẹwa ILÉ_N ; ! beauty
asán ILÉ_N ; ! vanity
àánú ILÉ_N ; ! mercy
owó ILÉ_N ; ! money
omi ILÉ_N ; ! water
àpò ILÉ_N ; ! backpack
iṣu ILÉ_N ; ! yam
ìwé ILÉ_N ; ! book
àga ILÉ_N ; ! chair
ẹran ILÉ_N ; ! animal
orí ILÉ_N ; ! head
ìgò ILÉ_N ; ! jar
èpè ILÉ_N ; ! oath
ilá ILÉ_N ; ! okra
ìbò ILÉ_N ; ! ballot
ata ILÉ_N ; ! pepper
èrò ILÉ_N ; ! concept
iyọ̀ ILÉ_N ; ! salt
odì ILÉ_N ; ! malice
ẹranko ILÉ_N ; ! animal
àpótí ILÉ_N ; ! box
ẹja ILÉ_N ; ! fish
ara ILÉ_N ; ! body
pápá ILÉ_N ; ! pasture
èdè ILÉ_N ; ! language
orí ILÉ_N ; ! head
irun ILÉ_N ; ! hair
imú ILÉ_N ; ! nose
etí ILÉ_N ; ! ear
ẹnu ILÉ_N ; ! mouth
àgbọ̀n ILÉ_N ; ! chin
ọrùn ILÉ_N ; ! neck
ògo ILÉ_N ; ! glory
ọjà ILÉ_N ; ! market
ewúro ILÉ_N ; ! bitter leaves
òkè ILÉ_N ; ! mountain
ṣẹ̀ẹ̀tì ILÉ_N ; ! shirt
kọ́ọ̀sì ILÉ_N ; ! course
síléètì ILÉ_N ; ! slate
kíláàsì ILÉ_N ; ! class
ìsẹ́ ILÉ_N ; ! poverty
ègún ILÉ_N ; ! thorn
òkú ILÉ_N ; ! corpse
ẹrù ILÉ_N ; ! load
aṣẹ́ ILÉ_N ; ! sieve
aṣọ ILÉ_N ; ! curtain
ibi ILÉ_N ; ! place
idì ILÉ_N ; ! eagle
ìrì ILÉ_N ; ! mist
òrò ILÉ_N ; ! conversation
iṣu ILÉ_N ; ! yam
irun ILÉ_N ; ! hair
ọkàn ILÉ_N ; ! heart 

ọmọ ỌMỌ_N ; ! child
ìyá ỌMỌ_N ; ! mother
ọkọ ỌMỌ_N ; ! husband
ọmọ ỌMỌ_N ; ! child
bàbá ỌMỌ_N ; ! father
àwòdì ỌMỌ_N ; ! hawk
ọba ỌMỌ_N ; ! king
dẹ́rẹ́bà ỌMỌ_N ; ! driver
ọ̀dẹ̀ ỌMỌ_N ; ! idiot
ọdẹ ỌMỌ_N ; ! idiot
ọmọkùnrin ỌMỌ_N ; ! young man
àdàbà ỌMỌ_N ; ! proposer, dove
àgbébọ̀ ỌMỌ_N ; ! hen
àkàlà ỌMỌ_N ; ! vulture
igún ỌMỌ_N ; ! vulture
gbẹ́nọ̀gbẹ́nò ỌMỌ_N ; ! woodpecker
àkùkọ ỌMỌ_N ; ! cockerel
àparò ỌMỌ_N ; ! partridge
apọ́n ỌMỌ_N ; ! red-beaked bird
àṣá ỌMỌ_N ; ! falcon, kite
àwòko ỌMỌ_N ; ! mockingbird

Olu OLU_N ; ! 
Ojo OLU_N ; ! 
Jímòọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Adé OLU_N ; ! 
Adébùsọlá OLU_N ; ! 
Adébáyo OLU_N ; ! 
Adékúnlé OLU_N ; ! 
Adérónkẹ OLU_N ; ! 
Lawal OLU_N ; ! 
Ifáṣadùn OLU_N ; ! 
Adéyẹmọ OLU_N ; ! 
Ọjọrá OLU_N ; ! 
Bímpé OLU_N ; ! 
Babalọlá OLU_N ; ! 
Bákàrè OLU_N ; ! 
Babátọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bínútirí OLU_N ; ! 
Bólújọ OLU_N ; ! 
Babárìndé OLU_N ; ! 
Bólúwadé OLU_N ; ! 
Bóyèdé OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́sẹ̀dé OLU_N ; ! 
Béyìòkú OLU_N ; ! 
Bímbọ́lú OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbálà OLU_N ; ! 
Bádérìn OLU_N ; ! 
Bolútifẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́láwá OLU_N ; ! 
Babawálé OLU_N ; ! 
Bísóyè OLU_N ; ! 
Bọláńlé OLU_N ; ! 
Bánjí OLU_N ; ! 
Bóorépọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bádéjí OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbé OLU_N ; ! 
Bádéwò OLU_N ; ! 
Bámigbáyé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámigbáiyé OLU_N ; ! 
Bétikú OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbáyé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbáiyé OLU_N ; ! 
Bùóyè OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́nọ̀jọ OLU_N ; ! 
Bólújókó OLU_N ; ! 
Bámitẹ́kọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bákindé OLU_N ; ! 
Babáníyì OLU_N ; ! 
Babáyẹmí OLU_N ; ! 
Báyọ̀dé OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́dúndé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbóṣé OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́lọ́rundúro OLU_N ; ! 
Bùkáyọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́dúnwá OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́dúnrìn OLU_N ; ! 
Babaìta OLU_N ; ! 
Búkóyè OLU_N ; ! 
Babágbèmí OLU_N ; ! 
Bọlánta OLU_N ; ! 
Bámishílé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámisé OLU_N ; ! 
Babánífẹ̀sí OLU_N ; ! 
Bárátúndé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámimọ́rẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bólódeòkú OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ̀dé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámidélé OLU_N ; ! 
Bóyèjọ OLU_N ; ! 
Bánkólé OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́lájí OLU_N ; ! 
Bándélé OLU_N ; ! 
Bídèmí OLU_N ; ! 
Bámiṣẹbí OLU_N ; ! 
Bíbíire OLU_N ; ! 
Babátúndé OLU_N ; ! 
Bádéwá OLU_N ; ! 
Bísólá OLU_N ; ! 
Bámimọ́rẹ OLU_N ; ! 
Bíbítáyò OLU_N ; ! 
Bàbá OLU_N ; ! 
Báyọ̀délé OLU_N ; ! 
Báyọ̀mi OLU_N ; ! 
Bántálẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bánkalẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bùkọ́nlá OLU_N ; ! 
Bọlárìnwá OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbọ́pá OLU_N ; ! 
Bángbọ́pá OLU_N ; ! 
Bámigbọ́pá OLU_N ; ! 
Bólúwadúró OLU_N ; ! 
Bámigbọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bángbọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Babátúnbọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bámikọ́láwọlé OLU_N ; ! 
Balógun OLU_N ; ! 
Báyọńlé OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bàbáoyè OLU_N ; ! 
Bámijókó OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́lọ́mọpé OLU_N ; ! 
Babańlá OLU_N ; ! 
Bámitọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bẹ́kọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bámilóyè OLU_N ; ! 
Bámigboyè OLU_N ; ! 
Bíọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bísálà OLU_N ; ! 
Bíálà OLU_N ; ! 
Bísúgà OLU_N ; ! 
Bánirẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bísádé OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́látitó OLU_N ; ! 
Babáfẹ́mi OLU_N ; ! 
Bùsọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́lánílé OLU_N ; ! 
Búsàrí OLU_N ; ! 
Bádéró OLU_N ; ! 
Bùsúyì OLU_N ; ! 
Bamgbáde OLU_N ; ! 
Bámigbádé OLU_N ; ! 
Bángbádé OLU_N ; ! 
Bùkúnmi OLU_N ; ! 
Bíòbákú OLU_N ; ! 
Bíléwú OLU_N ; ! 
Bámbọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bámitẹ́fa OLU_N ; ! 
Baṣọ̀run OLU_N ; ! 
Báòkú OLU_N ; ! 
Bífátifẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bùsáyọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́ládé OLU_N ; ! 
Bíntílayé OLU_N ; ! 
Bólúwají OLU_N ; ! 
Bángbọ́fá OLU_N ; ! 
Bíòkú OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ̀bádé OLU_N ; ! 
Bántẹ́fá OLU_N ; ! 
Bùsáyọ̀mi OLU_N ; ! 
Babásọlá OLU_N ; ! 
Bóyindé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámisayọ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bámisílé OLU_N ; ! 
Bámikọ́lé OLU_N ; ! 
Bótirí OLU_N ; ! 
Báyetifẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bósòro OLU_N ; ! 
Babátọ́pẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bímbọ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bádéjókò OLU_N ; ! 
Babalájé OLU_N ; ! 
Bunmi OLU_N ; ! 
Béjidé OLU_N ; ! 
Babábùnmi OLU_N ; ! 
Betiku OLU_N ; ! 
Babajamu OLU_N ; ! 
Babájídé OLU_N ; ! 
Babárínsá OLU_N ; ! 
Badà OLU_N ; ! 
Bàdàmọ́sí OLU_N ; ! 
Bádéjọ OLU_N ; ! 
Bájọmọ OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbọ́lá OLU_N ; ! 
Bámgbóyè OLU_N ; ! 
Bámisayé OLU_N ; ! 
Bánjọ OLU_N ; ! 
Bashọ̀run OLU_N ; ! 
Bẹwàjí OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́lájókò́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bọ́lákalẹ̀ OLU_N ; ! 
Bólú OLU_N ; ! 
Bólúwatifẹ́ OLU_N ; ! 
Bùkọlá OLU_N ; ! 


Ìbàdàn ÌBÀDÀN_N ; ! 


LEXICON VerbRoot

kú KÚ_VBLEX ; ! die
kán KÚ_VBLEX ; ! drop
fẹ́ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! love
gbàgbé KÚ_VBLEX ; ! forget
sáré KÚ_VBLEX ; ! race
rà KÚ_VBLEX ; ! acquire
wá KÚ_VBLEX ; ! be
jẹ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! answer
jẹun KÚ_VBLEX ; ! dine
fẹ́ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! love
fẹ́ràn KÚ_VBLEX ; ! love
pè KÚ_VBLEX ; ! call
jí KÚ_VBLEX ; ! wake
mú KÚ_VBLEX ; ! take
dín KÚ_VBLEX ; ! bake
pín KÚ_VBLEX ; ! part
sún KÚ_VBLEX ; ! nudge
sè KÚ_VBLEX ; ! bake
wẹ̀ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! bathe
gbà KÚ_VBLEX ; ! take
jẹun KÚ_VBLEX ; ! dine
lọ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! go
sùn KÚ_VBLEX ; ! sleep
tẹ̀lé KÚ_VBLEX ; ! follow
láálí KÚ_VBLEX ; ! rebuff
ni KÚ_VBLEX ; ! consist
sọ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! say
se KÚ_VBLEX ; ! do, implement
tà KÚ_VBLEX ; ! sell
ji KÚ_VBLEX ; ! awake
gun KÚ_VBLEX ; ! ride
mọ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! to know
rò KÚ_VBLEX ; ! to think
sọ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! to say
nifẹ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! to be in love
fọ̀ KÚ_VBLEX ; ! wash
tà KÚ_VBLEX ; ! sell
kí KÚ_VBLEX ; ! greet
wò KÚ_VBLEX ; ! see
rẹ́rìn KÚ_VBLEX ; ! laugh
rántí KÚ_VBLEX ; ! remember
gbá KÚ_VBLEX ; ! walk
rìn KÚ_VBLEX ; ! hit 

LEXICON ILÉ_N

%<n%>%<nn%>:   # ;

LEXICON ỌMỌ_N

%<n%>%<aa%>:   # ;

LEXICON ÌBÀDÀN_N

%<np%>%<loc%>:   # ;

LEXICON OLU_N

%<np%>%<ant%>:  #;

LEXICON KÚ_VBLEX

%<vblex%>:  #;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
